District of Columbia statutes.
7-2041

Summary suspension.

(a)

If, after an investigation, the Mayor determines that a licensee has failed to comply with the provisions of this subchapter or any rules promulgated pursuant to this subchapter in such a manner as to present an imminent danger to the health, safety, and welfare of children, infants, toddlers, or the general public, the Mayor may summarily suspend or restrict the license prior to a hearing.

(b)

The Mayor must provide the licensee with written notice of the summary suspension initiated pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, the reason for the suspension, and the right to request a hearing.

(c)

The licensee shall have 5 days after service of the notice of the summary suspension in which to request a hearing to challenge the summary suspension. A hearing shall be held within 5 business days of a timely request and the Mayor shall issue a decision within 5 business days after closing the record.

History

Apr. 13, 1999, D.C. Law 12-215, § 12, 46 DCR 274

Section References

This section is referenced in § 7-2044.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-3631.

Temporary Addition of Section

See notes to § 7-2031.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of subchapter, see notes to § 7-2031.